Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6124XS (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 2235 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 384.84B Sewer charges ââ unearned 1 fees. 2 1. The general assembly finds that municipal sewer charges 3 are intended to recover costs associated with actual wastewater 4 collection, treatment, and disposal. In cases of water leaks, 5 pipe failures, or similar conditions, water may be released 6 into soil, ground, or the environment without entering the 7 sanitary sewer system. Charging sewer service fees for water 8 that did not utilize sewer services constitutes a fee for 9 services not rendered. The retention of such charges is 10 inequitable, unearned, and contrary to principles of fairness 11 and public trust. It is therefore the intent of the general 12 assembly to ensure that sewer fees are based on actual sewer 13 usage, and municipalities do not collect or retain sewer 14 charges for water that did not enter the sewer system. 15 2. A city utility shall not charge, assess, or retain sewer 16 service fees for water that is demonstrated to have not entered 17 the sewer system due to any of the following: 18 a. Water line leak. 19 b. Service line failure. 20 c. Metered water loss to ground or environment. 21 d. Any other condition in which sewer services were not 22 utilized. 23 3. Upon reasonable verification of a qualifying water loss, 24 the city or municipal utility shall take the following actions: 25 a. Adjust the sewer service charges for the affected billing 26 period. 27 b. Refund any sewer service fees improperly collected. 28 4. a. A city may require reasonable documentation to verify 29 water loss, including the following: 30 (1) Repair invoices. 31 (2) Plumber certification. 32 (3) Utility inspection reports. 33 (4) Other evidence of leakage or loss. 34 b. A city shall not impose unreasonable evidentiary burdens 35 -1- LSB 6124XS (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2235 or arbitrary denial standards. 1 5. Requests for adjustment or refund shall be accepted for 2 a period of not less than twelve months following the billing 3 date in which the water loss occurred. 4 6. A city shall not adopt an ordinance or policy or 5 otherwise regulate a utility in a manner that limits, waives, 6 or circumvents the requirements of this section. 7 7. Any customer believed to have been affected by a 8 violation of this section may take any of the following 9 actions: 10 a. File a complaint with the office of ombudsman. 11 b. Seek recovery through civil action for improperly 12 collected fees, including court costs. 13 8. This section applies to all city utilities, and customers 14 of the city utility, operating sewer systems in Iowa. 15